fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX b4 Y 190
SFX b4 er er/n'q'd'l'm't's' er
SFX b4 er ant/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çant/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 ecer ece/n'q'j'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer eme/n'q'j'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener ene/n'q'j'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper epe/n'q'j'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer ere/n'q'j'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser ese/n'q'j'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever eve/n'q'j'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer evre/n'q'j'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter ete/n'q'j'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler ele/n'q'j'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 ecer eces/n'q'l'm't' ecer
SFX b4 emer emes/n'q'l'm't' emer
SFX b4 ener enes/n'q'l'm't' ener
SFX b4 eper epes/n'q'l'm't' eper
SFX b4 erer eres/n'q'l'm't' erer
SFX b4 eser eses/n'q'l'm't' eser
SFX b4 ever eves/n'q'l'm't' ever
SFX b4 evrer evres/n'q'l'm't' evrer
SFX b4 eter etes/n'q'l'm't' eter
SFX b4 eler eles/n'q'l'm't' eler
SFX b4 er ons/n'q'l't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çons/n'q'l't' cer
SFX b4 er ez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX b4 ecer ecent/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer ement/n'q'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener enent/n'q'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper epent/n'q'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer erent/n'q'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser esent/n'q'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever event/n'q'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer evrent/n'q'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter etent/n'q'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler elent/n'q'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 er ais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çais/n'q'j'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er ait/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çait/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 er ions/n'q'l't' er
SFX b4 er iez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX b4 er aient/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çaient/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 er ai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çai/n'q'j'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er as/n'q'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer ças/n'q'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er a/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer ça/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 er ames/n'q'l't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çames/n'q'l't' cer
SFX b4 er ates/n'q'l'm' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çates/n'q'l'm' cer
SFX b4 er erent/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX b4 ecer ecerai/n'q'j'l'm't' ecer
SFX b4 emer emerai/n'q'j'l'm't' emer
SFX b4 ener enerai/n'q'j'l'm't' ener
SFX b4 eper eperai/n'q'j'l'm't' eper
SFX b4 erer ererai/n'q'j'l'm't' erer
SFX b4 eser eserai/n'q'j'l'm't' eser
SFX b4 ever everai/n'q'j'l'm't' ever
SFX b4 evrer evrerai/n'q'j'l'm't' evrer
SFX b4 eter eterai/n'q'j'l'm't' eter
SFX b4 eler elerai/n'q'j'l'm't' eler
SFX b4 ecer eceras/n'q'l'm't' ecer
SFX b4 emer emeras/n'q'l'm't' emer
SFX b4 ener eneras/n'q'l'm't' ener
SFX b4 eper eperas/n'q'l'm't' eper
SFX b4 erer ereras/n'q'l'm't' erer
SFX b4 eser eseras/n'q'l'm't' eser
SFX b4 ever everas/n'q'l'm't' ever
SFX b4 evrer evreras/n'q'l'm't' evrer
SFX b4 eter eteras/n'q'l'm't' eter
SFX b4 eler eleras/n'q'l'm't' eler
SFX b4 ecer ecera/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer emera/n'q'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener enera/n'q'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper epera/n'q'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer erera/n'q'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser esera/n'q'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever evera/n'q'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer evrera/n'q'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter etera/n'q'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler elera/n'q'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 ecer ecerons/n'q'l't' ecer
SFX b4 emer emerons/n'q'l't' emer
SFX b4 ener enerons/n'q'l't' ener
SFX b4 eper eperons/n'q'l't' eper
SFX b4 erer ererons/n'q'l't' erer
SFX b4 eser eserons/n'q'l't' eser
SFX b4 ever everons/n'q'l't' ever
SFX b4 evrer evrerons/n'q'l't' evrer
SFX b4 eter eterons/n'q'l't' eter
SFX b4 eler elerons/n'q'l't' eler
SFX b4 ecer ecerez/n'q'l'm' ecer
SFX b4 emer emerez/n'q'l'm' emer
SFX b4 ener enerez/n'q'l'm' ener
SFX b4 eper eperez/n'q'l'm' eper
SFX b4 erer ererez/n'q'l'm' erer
SFX b4 eser eserez/n'q'l'm' eser
SFX b4 ever everez/n'q'l'm' ever
SFX b4 evrer evrerez/n'q'l'm' evrer
SFX b4 eter eterez/n'q'l'm' eter
SFX b4 eler elerez/n'q'l'm' eler
SFX b4 ecer eceront/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer emeront/n'q'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener eneront/n'q'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper eperont/n'q'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer ereront/n'q'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser eseront/n'q'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever everont/n'q'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer evreront/n'q'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter eteront/n'q'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler eleront/n'q'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 ecer ecerais/n'q'j'l'm't' ecer
SFX b4 emer emerais/n'q'j'l'm't' emer
SFX b4 ener enerais/n'q'j'l'm't' ener
SFX b4 eper eperais/n'q'j'l'm't' eper
SFX b4 erer ererais/n'q'j'l'm't' erer
SFX b4 eser eserais/n'q'j'l'm't' eser
SFX b4 ever everais/n'q'j'l'm't' ever
SFX b4 evrer evrerais/n'q'j'l'm't' evrer
SFX b4 eter eterais/n'q'j'l'm't' eter
SFX b4 eler elerais/n'q'j'l'm't' eler
SFX b4 ecer ecerait/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer emerait/n'q'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener enerait/n'q'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper eperait/n'q'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer ererait/n'q'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser eserait/n'q'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever everait/n'q'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer evrerait/n'q'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter eterait/n'q'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler elerait/n'q'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 ecer ecerions/n'q'l't' ecer
SFX b4 emer emerions/n'q'l't' emer
SFX b4 ener enerions/n'q'l't' ener
SFX b4 eper eperions/n'q'l't' eper
SFX b4 erer ererions/n'q'l't' erer
SFX b4 eser eserions/n'q'l't' eser
SFX b4 ever everions/n'q'l't' ever
SFX b4 evrer evrerions/n'q'l't' evrer
SFX b4 eter eterions/n'q'l't' eter
SFX b4 eler elerions/n'q'l't' eler
SFX b4 ecer eceriez/n'q'l'm' ecer
SFX b4 emer emeriez/n'q'l'm' emer
SFX b4 ener eneriez/n'q'l'm' ener
SFX b4 eper eperiez/n'q'l'm' eper
SFX b4 erer ereriez/n'q'l'm' erer
SFX b4 eser eseriez/n'q'l'm' eser
SFX b4 ever everiez/n'q'l'm' ever
SFX b4 evrer evreriez/n'q'l'm' evrer
SFX b4 eter eteriez/n'q'l'm' eter
SFX b4 eler eleriez/n'q'l'm' eler
SFX b4 ecer eceraient/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX b4 emer emeraient/n'q'l'm't's' emer
SFX b4 ener eneraient/n'q'l'm't's' ener
SFX b4 eper eperaient/n'q'l'm't's' eper
SFX b4 erer ereraient/n'q'l'm't's' erer
SFX b4 eser eseraient/n'q'l'm't's' eser
SFX b4 ever everaient/n'q'l'm't's' ever
SFX b4 evrer evreraient/n'q'l'm't's' evrer
SFX b4 eter eteraient/n'q'l'm't's' eter
SFX b4 eler eleraient/n'q'l'm't's' eler
SFX b4 er asse/n'q'j'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çasse/n'q'j'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er asses/n'q'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çasses/n'q'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er at/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çat/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 er assions/n'q'l't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çassions/n'q'l't' cer
SFX b4 er assiez/n'q'l'm' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çassiez/n'q'l'm' cer
SFX b4 er assent/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çassent/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 ecer ece/n'l'm't' ecer
SFX b4 emer eme/n'l'm't' emer
SFX b4 ener ene/n'l'm't' ener
SFX b4 eper epe/n'l'm't' eper
SFX b4 erer ere/n'l'm't' erer
SFX b4 eser ese/n'l'm't' eser
SFX b4 ever eve/n'l'm't' ever
SFX b4 evrer evre/n'l'm't' evrer
SFX b4 eter ete/n'l'm't' eter
SFX b4 eler ele/n'l'm't' eler
SFX b4 er ons/n'l' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çons/n'l' cer
SFX b4 er ez/n'l'm' er
